dev/apertium-en-de/apertium-en-de.de.dix
    <pardef n="Heck__n">
      <e>       <p>   <l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>s</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>s</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>s</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>s</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>s</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>   <l>es</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>   <l>e</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>   <l>e</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>   <l>en</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>   <l>e</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Gentlem/an__n">
      <e>       <p>   <l>an</l>      <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ans</l>     <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>an</l>      <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>an</l>      <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>en</l>      <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>en</l>      <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>en</l>      <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>en</l>      <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>   <l>anes</l>    <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Geschm/ack__n">
      <e>       <p>   <l>ack</l>     <r>ack<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>acks</l>    <r>ack<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ack</l>     <r>ack<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ack</l>     <r>ack<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>äcker</l>   <r>ack<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>äcker</l>   <r>ack<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>äckern</l>  <r>ack<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>äcker</l>   <r>ack<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>   <l>ackes</l>   <r>ack<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>   <l>acke</l>    <r>ack<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>   <l>äcke</l>    <r>ack<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>   <l>äcke</l>    <r>ack<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>   <l>äcken</l>   <r>ack<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>   <l>äcke</l>    <r>ack<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Schr/ank__n">
      <e>       <p>   <l>ank</l>     <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>anks</l>    <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ank</l>     <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ank</l>     <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>änke</l>    <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>änke</l>    <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>änken</l>   <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>änke</l>    <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>   <l>ankes</l>   <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>   <l>anke</l>    <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Gewissen__n">
      <e>       <p>   <l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>s</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Z/ahn__n">
      <e>       <p>   <l>ahn</l>     <r>ahn<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ahns</l>    <r>ahn<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ahn</l>     <r>ahn<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ahn</l>     <r>ahn<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ähne</l>    <r>ahn<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ähne</l>    <r>ahn<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ähnen</l>   <r>ahn<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ähne</l>    <r>ahn<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>   <l>ahnes</l>   <r>ahn<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>   <l>ahne</l>    <r>ahn<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Gl/as__n">
      <e>       <p>   <l>as</l>      <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ases</l>    <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>as</l>      <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>as</l>      <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>äser</l>    <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>äser</l>    <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>äsern</l>   <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>äser</l>    <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="Büfett"><i>Büfett</i><par n="Heck__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Buntglas"><i>Buntgl</i><par n="Gl/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Dekor"><i>Dekor</i><par n="Heck__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Duschgel"><i>Duschgel</i><par n="Heck__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Fernglas"><i>Ferngl</i><par n="Gl/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Gefrierschrank"><i>Gefrierschr</i><par n="Schr/ank__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Gentleman"><i>Gentlem</i><par n="Gentlem/an__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Geschirrschrank"><i>Geschirrschr</i><par n="Schr/ank__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Geschmack"><i>Geschm</i><par n="Geschm/ack__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Gestank"><i>Gest</i><par n="Schr/ank__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Gewissen"><i>Gewissen</i><par n="Gewissen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Glas"><i>Gl</i><par n="Gl/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Gras"><i>Gr</i><par n="Gl/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Heck"><i>Heck</i><par n="Heck__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Kleiderschrank"><i>Kleiderschr</i><par n="Schr/ank__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Kornett"><i>Kornett</i><par n="Heck__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Kühlschrank"><i>Kühlschr</i><par n="Schr/ank__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Schiffswrack"><i>Schiffswrack</i><par n="Heck__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Schrank"><i>Schr</i><par n="Schr/ank__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Schwank"><i>Schw</i><par n="Schr/ank__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Tablett"><i>Tablett</i><par n="Heck__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Trimester"><i>Trimester</i><par n="Gewissen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Verbrechen"><i>Verbrechen</i><par n="Gewissen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Wasserglas"><i>Wassergl</i><par n="Gl/as__n"/></e>
